Connecticut, session 2026, SB00406.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 14-288 of the 2026 supplement to
2 the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
3 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
4 (a) Each bicycle, electric bicycle or electric scooter operated upon the
5 public highway [, during the times or under the conditions as provided
6 in subsection (a) of section 14-96a,] shall display a lighted lamp upon
7 the forward part of such bicycle, electric bicycle or electric scooter (1) at
8 any time from a half-hour before sunset to a half-hour after sunrise, (2)
9 at any time when, due to insufficient light or unfavorable atmospheric
10 conditions, persons and vehicles on the highway are not clearly
11 discernible at a distance of five hundred feet ahead, and (3) at any time
12 during periods of precipitation, including, but not limited to, periods of
13 snow, rain or fog. Such lamp shall, when lighted, emit a white light
14 which in clear weather shall be visible at a distance of not less than five
SB406 / File No. 304 1

SB406 File No. 304
15 hundred feet in the direction in which such bicycle, electric bicycle or
16 electric scooter is proceeding. Each bicycle, electric bicycle or electric
17 scooter shall also, at all times, be equipped with a reflector or reflecting
18 tail light lens, which reflector or lens shall be attached to the rear of such
19 bicycle, electric bicycle or electric scooter in such manner as to reflect
20 rays of light thrown upon the same, and such reflector or reflecting tail
21 shall be visible at a distance of not less than six hundred feet from the
22 rear when illuminated by the head lamps of a motor vehicle. Such
23 bicycle, electric bicycle or electric scooter shall also be equipped with
24 reflective material so placed and of sufficient size and reflectivity to be
25 visible from both sides of such bicycle, electric bicycle or electric scooter
26 at a distance of not less than six hundred feet when illuminated by the
27 head lamps of a motor vehicle. Each bicycle, electric bicycle or electric
28 scooter shall also, at all times, be equipped with a braking device
29 sufficient to enable the operator thereof to stop within twenty-five feet
30 on dry, level and clean pavement when moving at a speed of ten miles
31 per hour. No person shall equip a bicycle, an electric bicycle or an
32 electric scooter with a siren or device which emits a whistle or use a siren
33 or device which emits a whistle while operating a bicycle, an electric
34 bicycle or an electric scooter.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 14-288(a)
PS Joint Favorable
SB406 / File No. 304 2

SB406 File No. 304
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
State Resources GF&TF - Minimal Minimal
Potential
Revenue Gain
Note: GF&TF=General Fund & Transportation Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which requires certain small vehicles to display a lighted
lamp when operating on public highways at certain times, results in a
minimal potential revenue gain to the extent new offenses are
committed and fines are collected.1
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the number of offenses and fines
collected.
1 Between FY 22 and FY 25, 17 offenses were recorded under CGS § 14-288 and $368 in
fines was collected.
SB406 / File No. 304 3

SB406 File No. 304
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 406
AN ACT CONCERNING THE DISPLAY OF LIGHTED LAMPS ON
BICYCLES, ELECTRIC BICYCLES AND ELECTRIC SCOOTERS.